Utah statutes.
69-3-1.   Authority to acquire sites -- Title.

The state, counties, cities, and towns may create or acquire sites to accommodate the erection of telecommunication towers and related facilities.  Title to these sites shall be retained by the state, county, city, or town acquiring such sites in order to promote the location of such towers in a manageable area and to protect the aesthetics and environment of the area.

